District of Columbia statutes.
32-222

Prosecutions.

Prosecutions for violations of any of the provisions of this subchapter, or of any regulation made by the Board of Education under authority of this subchapter, shall be on information filed in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia in the name of the District of Columbia by the Corporation Counsel or any assistants.

History

May 29, 1928, 45 Stat. 1006, ch. 908, § 26
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 578, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 159(j)(2)
renumbered as § 22 and amended June 15, 1976, D.C. Law 1-68, § 2(27), 23 DCR 527

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 36-524.
1973 Ed., § 36-228.